Maryland, session 2026, SB0199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
7–1101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of Disabilities.
(c) “ELIGIBLE COMPANION” MEANS AN ACCOMPANYING FAMILY MEMBER
OR DIRECT SUPPORT PROFESSIONAL OF AN INDIVIDUAL WITH DISABILITIES OR OF
A SERVICE–DISABLED VETERAN PARTICIPATING IN SAILING, BOATING, KAYAKING,
CANOEING, PADDLEBOARDING, OR SURFING ACTIVITIES.
(D) “Fund” means the Individuals With Disabilities and Service–Disabled
Veterans Boating Fund.
[(d)] (E) (1) “Individuals with disabilities” means individuals considered
disabled in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
§ 12102.
(2) “Individuals with disabilities” includes individuals with learning
disabilities.
– 1 –

Ch. 654 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(e)] (F) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Disabilities.
[(f)] (G) “Service–disabled veteran” means a veteran with a disability that is
service–connected, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(16).
7–1102.
(a) There is an Individuals With Disabilities and Service–Disabled Veterans
Boating Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to provide sailing, boating, kayaking, canoeing,
paddleboarding, and surfing opportunities for individuals with disabilities [and],
service–disabled veterans, AND THEIR ELIGIBLE COMPANIONS.
(c) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(2) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only for:
(1) providing State grants under this section; and
(2) administrative expenses of the Department in administering the Fund.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department may
provide a grant of not more than $40,000 in a fiscal year to a grantee to provide sailing,
boating, kayaking, canoeing, paddleboarding, or surfing opportunities for individuals with
disabilities AND THEIR ELIGIBLE COMPANIONS or service–disabled veterans AND THEIR
ELIGIBLE COMPANIONS.
(2) The Department may provide grants under this section only to a
nonprofit organization in good standing that:
(i) is qualified under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 654
(ii) has been in operation for at least 3 years, notwithstanding a
cessation of operations during a national or public health emergency issued:
1. by the President of the United States under § 201, § 202(d),
or § 301 of the federal National Emergencies Act; or
2. by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under the
federal Public Health Service Act; and
(iii) has engaged individuals with disabilities or service–disabled
veterans in sailing, boating, kayaking, canoeing, paddleboarding, or surfing activities on
State waters at least 25 times in each of the past 3 years.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –